Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.110

International fire code—Administration and enforcement by counties, other political subdivisions and municipal corporations—Fees.

Each county government shall administer and enforce the International Fire Code in the unincorporated areas of the county: PROVIDED, That any political subdivision or municipal corporation providing fire protection pursuant to RCW 14.08.120 shall, at its sole option, be responsible for administration and enforcement of the International Fire Code on its facility. Any fire protection district or political subdivision may, pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, the interlocal cooperation act, assume all or a portion of the administering responsibility and coordinate and cooperate with the county government in the enforcement of the International Fire Code.

It is not the intent of RCW 19.27.110 and 19.27.111 to preclude or limit the authority of any city, town, county, fire protection district, state agency, or political subdivision from engaging in those fire prevention activities with which they are charged.

It is not the intent of the legislature by adopting the state building code or RCW 19.27.110 and 19.27.111 to grant counties any more power to suppress or extinguish fires than counties currently possess under the Constitution or other statutes.

Each county is authorized to impose fees sufficient to pay the cost of inspections, administration, and enforcement pursuant to RCW 19.27.110 and 19.27.111.

[ 2003 c 291 s 4; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 37 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2003 c 291: See note following RCW 19.27.031.